Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WAYZATA SECTION HOUSE.new text end new text begin $641,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Wayzata to renovate the historic Wayzata Section House and convert it to a Lakeshore Learning Center. new text end